ko: 호환 유해 폐기물 유형: 생물학적 위험 폐기물; 화학적; 의약품; 방사능; 다용도 바늘; 범용; 기타
es: Tipo de residuo peligroso compatible: Riesgo biológico; Químico; Farmacéutico; Radioactivo; Objetos punzantes; Universal; Otros
ru: Совместимый тип опасных отходов: Биологические; Химические; Фармацевтические; Радиоактивный; Острые инструменты; Универсальный продукт; Другие
zh-TW: 相容危險廢棄物類型: 生物危害; 化學; 藥物; 放射性; 尖銳物; 普通; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместим вид опасни отпадъци: Биологична опасност; Химически; Фармацевтични; Радиоактивен; Игли с остър връх; Универсално; Друго
sv: Typ av kompatibelt farligt avfall: Biologisk fara; Kemiskt; Farmaceutisk; Radioaktiv; Nålar; Universell; Övrigt
el: Συμβατός τύπος επικίνδυνων αποβλήτων: Βιολογικά επικίνδυνα; Χημικά; Φαρμακευτικά; Ραδιενεργά; Αιχμηρά; Universal; Άλλο
cs: Kompatibilní typ nebezpečného odpadu: Biologické riziko; Chemický odpad; Farmaceutický odpad; Radioaktivní; Ostré předměty; Univerzální; Jiné
ja: 適合する有害廃棄物の種類: バイオハザード; 化学; 医薬品; 放射性; 鋭利物; ユニバーサル; その他
nl: Geschikt type gevaarlijk afval: Biologisch gevaar; Chemisch; Farmaceutisch; Radioactief; Scherpe voorwerpen; Universeel; Overig
pl: Kompatybilny typ odpadów niebezpiecznych: Odpady biologiczne; Odpady chemiczne; Odpady farmaceutyczne; Radioaktywny; Odpady medyczne ostre; Uniwersalne; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Suderinamas pavojingų atliekų tipas: Biologinis pavojus; Cheminis; Farmacija; Radioaktyvios; Smailios adatos; Universalus; Kita
vi: Loại chất thải nguy hại tương thích: Nguy hiểm sinh học; Hóa học; Dược phẩm; Phóng xạ; Kim khâu tiêu chuẩn; Phổ dụng; Khác
fr: Type de déchets dangereux compatibles: Danger biologique; Chimique; Produit pharmaceutique; Radioactif; Objets tranchants; Universel; Autre
en: Compatible hazardous waste type: Biohazard; Chemical; Pharmaceutical; Radioactive; Sharps; Universal; Other
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta nevarnih odpadkov: Biološka nevarnost; Kemični; Farmacevtski; Radioaktivno; Strojne igle; Univerzalno; Druga
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ nebezpečného odpadu: Biologické nebezpečenstvo; Chemický; Farmaceutický; Rádioaktívny; Ihly; Univerzálny; Iné
th: ประเภทของเสียอันตรายที่รองรับได้: อันตรายทางชีวภาพ; ทางเคมี; ทางเภสัชกรรม; กัมมันตรังสี; ของมีคม; สากล; อื่นๆ
fi: Yhteensopiva vaarallisen jätteen tyyppi: Biovaara; Kemiallinen; Farmaseuttinen; Radioaktiivinen; Terävät; Yleinen; Muu
tr: Uyumlu tehlikeli atık türü: Biyolojik tehlike; Kimyasal; Farmasötik; Radyoaktif; Kesici-delici; Evrensel; Diğer
da: Kompatibel farlig affaldstype: Biologisk fare; Kemisk; Farmaceutisk; Radioaktiv; Skarpe dele; Universal; Andet
nb: Kompatibel farlig avfallstype: Biologisk fare; Kjemikalie; Farmasøytisk; Radioaktiv; Skarpe; Universal; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de deșeuri periculoase compatibile: Biologic periculos; Chimic; Farmaceutic; Radioactiv; Ace ascuțite; Universal; Altele
zh-CN: 兼容的危险废物类型: 生物危害; 化学品; 药品; 放射性废弃物; 锐器; 通用型; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis veszélyes hulladéktípus: Biológiai veszély; Kémiai; Gyógyszerészeti; Radioaktív; Injekciós tűk; Általános; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de resíduo perigoso compatível: Risco biológico; Químico; Farmacêutico; Radioativo; Agulhas de ponta seta; Universal; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de resíduo perigoso compatível: Risco biológico; Químico; Farmacêutico; Radioativo; Objetos cortantes e perfurantes; Universal; Outro
it: Tipo di rifiuto pericoloso compatibile: Rifiuti biologici pericolosi; Chimico; Farmaceutico; Radioattivo; Aghi; Universale; Altro
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta opasnog otpada: Biološka opasnost; Kemijski; Farmaceutski; Radioaktivno; Oštre igle; Univerzalno; Ostalo
de: Kompatibler Sondermülltyp: Biologische Gefahr; Chemisch; Pharmaceutical; Radioaktiv; Scharf; Universell; Sonstiges